Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1808
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 60-1801 to 60-1808 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1969, c. 627, § 8, p. 2528;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 99.